Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Municipal Property Tax.

Cross references. —

For applicability of this article to home rule and general law municipalities, see AS

29.45.800

.

Administrative Code. —

For population determination for municipal oil and gas production property tax limitations, see 3 AAC 131.

For senior citizen and disabled veteran property tax exemption, see 3 AAC 135.

For senior citizen property tax equivalency payment, see 3 AAC 136.

Sec. 29.45.010.
Property tax.

A unified municipality may levy a property tax. A borough may levy

an areawide property tax for areawide functions;

a nonareawide property tax for functions limited to the area outside cities;

a property tax in a service area for functions limited to the service area.

A home rule or first class city may levy a property tax subject to AS

29.45.550

—

29.45.560

. A second class city may levy a property tax subject to AS

29.45.590

.

If a tax is levied on real property or on personal property, the tax must be assessed, levied, and collected as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.45.020.
Taxpayer notice.

If a municipality levies and collects property taxes, the governing body shall provide the following notice:

furnishing a copy of the notice with tax statements mailed for the fiscal year for which aid is received; or

publishing in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality a copy of the notice once each week for a period of three successive weeks, with publication to occur not later than 45 days after the final adoption of the municipality’s budget.

Compliance with the provisions of this section is a prerequisite to receipt of community assistance under AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

. The department shall withhold annual allocations under those sections until municipal officials demonstrate that the requirements of this section have been met.

“NOTICE TO TAXPAYER
For the current fiscal year the (city)(borough) has been allocated the following amount of state aid for school and municipal purposes under the applicable financial assistance Acts: PUBLIC SCHOOL FUNDING
PROGRAM () AS 14.17 $ STATE AID FOR RETIREMENT OF SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION DEBT () AS

14.11.100

$ COMMUNITY REVENUE SHARING PROGRAM
( — ) AS

29.60.850

29.60.879

$ TOTAL AID $

Click to view

The millage equivalent of this state aid, based on the dollar value of a mill in the municipality during the current assessment year and for the preceding assessment year, is:

MILLAGE EQUIVALENT PREVIOUS YEAR THIS YEAR PUBLIC SCHOOL FUNDING
PROGRAM ASSISTANCE MILLS MILLS STATE AID FOR RETIREMENT OF
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION DEBT MILLS MILLS COMMUNITY REVENUE SHARING
PROGRAM MILLS MILLS TOTAL MILLAGE EQUIVALENT MILLS MILLS”

Click to view

Notice shall be provided by

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 1997; am § 33 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective April 9, 2008, substituted references to the community revenue sharing program for references to municipal tax resource equalization, priority revenue sharing for municipal services, and revenue sharing for safe communities in the dollar and millage tables in subsection (a) and in the first sentence of subsection (b)

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a) and (b), substituted “assistance” for “revenue sharing” in 3 places.

Sec. 29.45.030.
Required exemptions.

The following property is exempt from general taxation:

municipal property, including property held by a public corporation of a municipality, state property, property of the University of Alaska, or land that is in the trust established by the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act of 1956, P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709, except that

a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property is taxable to the extent of the interest; however, an interest created by an operating agreement or nonexclusive use agreement between the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority and a user of a shipyard or an integrated transportation and port facility, if the shipyard or integrated transportation and port facility is owned by the authority and initially placed in service before January 1, 1999, is taxable only to the extent of, and for the value associated with, those specific improvements used for lodging purposes;

notwithstanding any other provision of law, property acquired by an agency, corporation, or other entity of the state through foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure and retained as an investment of a state entity is taxable; this subparagraph does not apply to federal land granted to the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.380

or

14.40.390

, or to other land granted to the university by the state to replace land that had been granted under AS

14.40.380

or

14.40.390

, or to land conveyed by the state to the university under AS

14.40.365

;

an ownership interest of a municipality in real property located outside the municipality acquired after December 31, 1990, is taxable by another municipality; however, a borough may not tax an interest in real property located in the borough and owned by a city in that borough;

household furniture and personal effects of members of a household;

property used exclusively for nonprofit religious, charitable, cemetery, hospital, or educational purposes;

property of a nonbusiness organization composed entirely of persons with 90 days or more of active service in the armed forces of the United States whose conditions of service and separation were other than dishonorable, or the property of an auxiliary of that organization;

money on deposit;

the real property of certain residents of the state to the extent and subject to the conditions provided in (e) of this section;

real property or an interest in real property that is

exempt from taxation under 43 U.S.C. 1620(d), as amended or under 43 U.S.C. 1636(d), as amended; or

acquired from a municipality in exchange for land that is exempt from taxation under (A) of this paragraph, and is not developed or made subject to a lease;

property of a political subdivision, agency, corporation, or other entity of the United States to the extent required by federal law; except that a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property is taxable to the extent of that interest unless the property is located on a military base or installation and the property interest is created under 10 U.S.C. 2871 — 2885 (Military Housing Privatization Initiative), if the leaseholder enters into an agreement to make a payment in lieu of taxes to the political subdivision that has taxing authority;

natural resources in place including coal, ore bodies, mineral deposits, and other proven and unproven deposits of valuable materials laid down by natural processes, unharvested aquatic plants and animals, and timber;

property not exempt under (3) of this subsection that

is owned by a private, nonprofit college or university that is accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or the United States Department of Education, or both; and

was subject to a private leasehold, contract, or other private interest on January 1, 2010, except that a holder of a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property shall be taxed to the extent of that interest.

In (a) of this section, “property used exclusively for religious purposes” includes the following property owned by a religious organization:

the residence of an educator in a private religious or parochial school or a bishop, pastor, priest, rabbi, minister, or religious order of a recognized religious organization; for purposes of this paragraph, “minister” means an individual who is

ordained, commissioned, or licensed as a minister according to standards of the religious organization for its ministers; and

employed by the religious organization to carry out a ministry of that religious organization;

a structure, its furniture, and its fixtures used solely for public worship, charitable purposes, religious administrative offices, religious education, or a nonprofit hospital;

lots required by local ordinance for parking near a structure defined in (2) of this subsection.

Property described in (a)(3) or (4) of this section from which income is derived is exempt only if that income is solely from use of the property by nonprofit religious, charitable, hospital, or educational groups. If used by nonprofit educational groups, the property is exempt only if used exclusively for classroom space.

Laws exempting certain property from execution under AS 09 (Code of Civil Procedure) do not exempt the property from taxes levied and collected by municipalities.

The real property owned and occupied as the primary residence and permanent place of abode by a resident who is (1) 65 years of age or older; (2) a disabled veteran; or (3) at least 60 years of age and the widow or widower of a person who qualified for an exemption under (1) or (2) of this subsection is exempt from taxation on the first $150,000 of the assessed value of the real property. A municipality may by ordinance approved by the voters grant the exemption under this subsection to the widow or widower under 60 years of age of a person who qualified for an exemption under (2) of this subsection or to a resident who is the widow or widower of a person who dies from a service-connected cause sustained while serving as a member of the United States armed forces or as a member of the National Guard. A municipality may, in case of hardship, provide for exemption beyond the first $150,000 of assessed value in accordance with regulations of the department. Only one exemption may be granted for the same property, and, if two or more persons are eligible for an exemption for the same property, the parties shall decide between or among themselves who is to receive the benefit of the exemption. Real property may not be exempted under this subsection if the assessor determines, after notice and hearing to the parties, that the property was conveyed to the applicant primarily for the purpose of obtaining the exemption. The determination of the assessor may be appealed under AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

. A municipality shall determine the eligibility requirements and application procedure for an optional exemption provided under this subsection. In this subsection, “widow or widower” means a person whose spouse has died and who has not remarried.

To be eligible for an exemption under (e) of this section for a year, a municipality may by ordinance require that an individual also meet requirements under one of the following paragraphs: (1) the individual shall be eligible for a permanent fund dividend under AS

43.23.005

for that same year or for the immediately preceding year; or (2) if the individual has not applied or does not apply for one or both of the permanent fund dividends, the individual would have been eligible for one of the permanent fund dividends identified in (1) of this subsection had the individual applied. An exemption may not be granted under (e) of this section except upon written application for the exemption. Each municipality shall, by ordinance, establish procedures and deadlines for filing the application. The governing body of the municipality for good cause shown may waive the claimant’s failure to make timely application for exemption and authorize the assessor to accept the application as if timely filed. If an application is filed within the required time and is approved by the assessor, the assessor shall allow an exemption in accordance with the provisions of (e) of this section. If the application for exemption is approved after taxes have been paid, the amount of tax that the claimant has already paid for the property exempted shall be refunded to the claimant. The assessor shall require proof in the form the assessor considers necessary of the right to and amount of an exemption claimed under (e) of this section, and shall require a disabled veteran claiming an exemption under (e) of this section to provide evidence of the disability rating. The assessor may require proof under this subsection at any time.

The state shall reimburse a borough or city, as appropriate, for the real property tax revenues lost to it by the operation of (e) of this section. However, reimbursement may be made to a municipality for revenue lost to it only to the extent that the loss exceeds an exemption that was granted by the municipality, or that on proper application by an individual would have been granted under AS

29.45.050(a)

. If appropriations are not sufficient to fully fund reimbursements under this subsection, the amount available shall be distributed pro rata among eligible municipalities.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, nothing in (e) — (j) of this section affects similar exemptions from property taxes granted by a municipality on September 10, 1972, or prevents a municipality from granting similar exemptions by ordinance as provided in AS

29.45.050

.

In (e) — (i) of this section,

“disabled veteran” means a disabled person

separated from the military service of the United States under a condition that is not dishonorable who is a resident of the state, whose disability was incurred or aggravated in the line of duty in the military service of the United States, and whose disability has been rated as 50 percent or more by the branch of service in which that person served or by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or

who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard, who is a resident of the state, whose disability was incurred or aggravated in the line of duty while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard, and whose disability has been rated as 50 percent or more;

“real property” includes but is not limited to mobile homes, whether classified as real or personal property for municipal tax purposes.

One motor vehicle per household owned by a resident 65 years of age or older on January 1 of the assessment year is exempt either from taxation on its assessed value or from the registration tax under AS

28.10.431

. An exemption may be granted under this subsection only upon written application on a form prescribed by the Department of Administration.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of (g) and (j) of this section.

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 9, SLA 2017.]

For the purpose of determining property exempt under (a)(7)(A) of this section, the following definitions apply to terms used in 43 U.S.C. 1620(d) unless superseded by applicable federal law, and for the purpose of determining property exempt under (a)(7)(B) of this section, the following definitions apply:

“developed” means a purposeful modification of the property from its original state that effectuates a condition of gainful and productive present use without further substantial modification; surveying, construction of roads, providing utilities or other similar actions normally considered to be component parts of the development process, but that do not create the condition described in this paragraph, do not constitute a developed state within the meaning of this paragraph; developed property, in order to remove the exemption, must be developed for purposes other than exploration, and be limited to the smallest practicable tract of the property actually used in the developed state;

“exploration” means the examination and investigation of undeveloped land to determine the existence of subsurface nonrenewable resources;

“lease” means a grant of primary possession entered into for gainful purposes with a determinable fee remaining in the hands of the grantor; with respect to a lease that conveys rights of exploration and development, this exemption shall continue with respect to that portion of the leased tract that is used solely for the purpose of exploration.

If property or an interest in property that is determined not to be exempt under (a)(7) of this section reverts to an undeveloped state, or if the lease is terminated, the exemption shall be granted, subject to the provisions of (a)(7) and (m) of this section.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 91 SLA 1985; am § 44 ch 37 SLA 1986; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 70 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1991; am § 14 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 97 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 99 § 71 (1997); am § 81 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 117 SLA 2000; am § 8 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 2008; am §§ 1, 2 ch 101 SLA 2008; am §§ 1, 2, 4, 8 ch 10 SLA 2010; am §§
1, 2, ch 71 SLA 2010; am §§
4, 5 ch 61 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 2013; am § 8 ch 9 SLA 2017; am §§ 1, 2 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Delayed amendment of paragraph (a)(10). —

Under §§ 3 and 9, ch. 10, SLA 2010, effective December 31, 2035, paragraph (a)(10) of this section will read: “property not exempt under (3) of this subsection that is owned by a private, nonprofit college or university that is accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or the United States Department of Education, or both, except that a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property is taxable to the extent of the private interest.”

Delayed amendment of paragraph (a)(1). —

Under secs. 2 and 26, ch. 64, SLA 2018, effective November 30, 2027, paragraph (a)(1) will read as follows:

“(a) The following property is exempt from general taxation:

“(1) municipal property, including property held by a public corporation of a municipality, state property, property of the University of Alaska, or land that is in the trust established by the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act of 1956, P.L. 84- 830,
70 Stat. 709, except that

“(A) a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property is taxable to the extent of the interest;

“(B) notwithstanding any other provision of law, property acquired by an agency, corporation, or other entity of the state through foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure and retained as an investment of a state entity is taxable; this subparagraph does not apply to federal land granted to the University of Alaska under
AS

14.40.380

or

14.40.390

, or to other land granted to the university by the state to replace land that had been granted under
AS

14.40.380

or

14.40.390

, or to land conveyed by the state to the university under
AS

14.40.365

;

“(C) an ownership interest of a municipality in real property located outside the municipality acquired after December 31, 1990, is taxable by another municipality; however, a borough may not tax an interest in real property located in the borough and owned by a city in that borough;”

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendments made to (e) and (g) of this section by §§ 1 and 2, ch. 91, SLA 1985 were enacted as amendments to AS 29.53.020(e) and (g). Chapter 74, SLA 1985 enacted AS

29.45.030

and repealed AS 29.53.020. The effective date of both 1985 Acts is January 1, 1986. The legislature’s intent to amend the property tax exemption provisions has been recognized by treating the amendments to AS 29.53.020(e) and (g) as amendments to (e) and (g) of this section.

The amendment to (a)(1)(A) of this section made by § 3, ch. 117, SLA 2000 took effect July 1, 2007; however, §§ 2 and 3, ch. 67, SLA 2008, retroactively changed the effective date of the § 3, ch. 117, SLA 2000 amendment to November 30, 2009.

Cross references. —

For exemption of electric and telephone cooperatives from local ad valorem taxes, see AS

10.25.540(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For senior citizen and disabled veteran property tax exemption, see 3 AAC 135.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2000 amendment, by § 3 ch 117 SLA 2000, effective November 30, 2009, deleted “however, an interest created by a nonexclusive use agreement between the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority and a user of an integrated transportation and port facility owned by the authority and initially placed in service before January 1, 1999, is taxable only to the extent of, and for the value associated with, those specific improvements used for lodging purposes;” at the end of subparagraph (a)(1)(A).

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, in paragraph (a)(8), added the language beginning with “unless the property is located” at the end of the paragraph.

The 2006 amendment, effective August 23, 2006, inserted “an educator in a private religious or parochial school or” and “for purposes of this paragraph, ‘minister’ means an individual who is” in paragraph (b)(1), and added subparagraphs (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(B).

The 2008 amendment, effective June 18, 2008, inserted “or under 43 U.S.C. 1636(d), as amended” in subparagraph (a)(7)(A), added subparagraph (a)(7)(B) and made related changes, substituted “(a)(7)(A)” for “(a)(7)” in the introductory language of subsection (m), and added “and for the purpose of determining property exempt under (a)(7)(B) of this section, the following definitions apply” at the end of the introductory language of subsection (m).

The first 2010 amendment, effective May 2, 2010, and retroactive to November 30, 2009, in (a)(1)(A), added the language following “a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property is taxable to the extent of the interest;”; added (a)(10); in (e), effective July 30, 2010, added the second sentence and made stylistic changes.

The second 2010 amendment, effective June 12, 2010, and retroactive to July 1, 2007, in (a)(1)(A), added “however, an interest created by a nonexclusive use agreement between the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority and a user of an integrated transportation and port facility owned by the authority and initially placed in service before January 1, 1999, is taxable only to the extent of, and for the value associated with, those specific improvements used for lodging purposes;” following “extent of the interest;”.

The 2013 amendment, effective June 3, 2013, retroactive to January 1, 2013, in (e), at the end of the second sentence added “or to a resident who is the widow or widower of a person who dies from a service-connected cause sustained while serving as a member of the United States armed forces or as a member of the National Guard”; added the last two sentences.

The 2010 and 2012 amendments, effective November 30, 2017, in (a)(1)(A), deleted language related to interests created by a nonexclusive use agreement between the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority and a user of an integrated transportation and port facility.

The 2017 amendment, effective June 13, 2017, repealed (

l

).

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in (a)(1)(A), added the language beginning “however, an interest created by an operating agreement” through the end of the subparagraph, in (a)(8), substituted “if the leaseholder” for “provided that a leaseholder”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 3, ch. 101, SLA 2008, the 2008 amendments of (a)(7) and (m) of this section are retroactive to January 1, 2008.

Under § 6, ch. 10, SLA 2010, the amendment of (a)(1)(A) of this section made by § 1, ch. 10, SLA 2010, is retroactive to November 30, 2009.
Under § 9, ch. 71, SLA 2010, the same amendment of (a)(1)(A) of this section made by § 1, ch. 71, SLA 2010, is retroactive to July 1, 2007.

Under sec. 2, ch. 29, SLA 2013 the 2013 amendments to (e) of this section are retroactive to January 1, 2013.

Under sec. 24, ch. 64, SLA 2018, the amendment of subsection (a) made by sec. 1, ch. 64, SLA 2018, “is retroactive to November 30, 2017.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The constitutional convention intended that only so much of the property used for religious purposes as was being used to produce income should be taxable, that such other parts should be exempt, and that a proration between taxable and nontaxable parts should be made. 1962 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 15, decided under former, similar law.

All religious property in the state not used for business, rent or profit, is exempt from taxation. 1962 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 15, decided under former, similar law.

The Division of Land has no liability for local property taxes by virtue of subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of this section on land that it reacquires through a contract termination under AS

38.05.065(d)

, (e), (f) and (g) because such lands are not acquired “through foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure” nor are they lands “retained as an investment of a state entity.” However, if taxes are owed, they are owed for every year in which the property was legally taxable; and the issue of taxability will largely turn on who the owner of record was as of January 1 of the relevant year. June 14, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.45.030.
Required exemptions.

The following property is exempt from general taxation:

municipal property, including property held by a public corporation of a municipality, state property, property of the University of Alaska, or land that is in the trust established by the Alaska Mental Health Enabling Act of 1956, P.L. 84-830, 70 Stat. 709, except that

a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property is taxable to the extent of the interest;

notwithstanding any other provision of law, property acquired by an agency, corporation, or other entity of the state through foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure and retained as an investment of a state entity is taxable; this subparagraph does not apply to federal land granted to the University of Alaska under AS

14.40.380

or

14.40.390

, or to other land granted to the university by the state to replace land that had been granted under AS

14.40.380

or

14.40.390

, or to land conveyed by the state to the university under AS

14.40.365

;

an ownership interest of a municipality in real property located outside the municipality acquired after December 31, 1990, is taxable by another municipality; however, a borough may not tax an interest in real property located in the borough and owned by a city in that borough;

household furniture and personal effects of members of a household;

property used exclusively for nonprofit religious, charitable, cemetery, hospital, or educational purposes;

property of a nonbusiness organization composed entirely of persons with 90 days or more of active service in the armed forces of the United States whose conditions of service and separation were other than dishonorable, or the property of an auxiliary of that organization;

money on deposit;

the real property of certain residents of the state to the extent and subject to the conditions provided in (e) of this section;

real property or an interest in real property that is

exempt from taxation under 43 U.S.C. 1620(d), as amended or under 43 U.S.C. 1636(d), as amended; or

acquired from a municipality in exchange for land that is exempt from taxation under (A) of this paragraph, and is not developed or made subject to a lease;

property of a political subdivision, agency, corporation, or other entity of the United States to the extent required by federal law; except that a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property is taxable to the extent of that interest unless the property is located on a military base or installation and the property interest is created under 10 U.S.C. 2871 — 2885 (Military Housing Privatization Initiative), if the leaseholder enters into an agreement to make a payment in lieu of taxes to the political subdivision that has taxing authority;

natural resources in place including coal, ore bodies, mineral deposits, and other proven and unproven deposits of valuable materials laid down by natural processes, unharvested aquatic plants and animals, and timber;

property not exempt under (3) of this subsection that

is owned by a private, nonprofit college or university that is accredited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or the United States Department of Education, or both; and

was subject to a private leasehold, contract, or other private interest on January 1, 2010, except that a holder of a private leasehold, contract, or other interest in the property shall be taxed to the extent of that interest.

In (a) of this section, “property used exclusively for religious purposes” includes the following property owned by a religious organization:

the residence of an educator in a private religious or parochial school or a bishop, pastor, priest, rabbi, minister, or religious order of a recognized religious organization; for purposes of this paragraph, “minister” means an individual who is

ordained, commissioned, or licensed as a minister according to standards of the religious organization for its ministers; and

employed by the religious organization to carry out a ministry of that religious organization;

a structure, its furniture, and its fixtures used solely for public worship, charitable purposes, religious administrative offices, religious education, or a nonprofit hospital;

lots required by local ordinance for parking near a structure defined in (2) of this subsection.

Property described in (a)(3) or (4) of this section from which income is derived is exempt only if that income is solely from use of the property by nonprofit religious, charitable, hospital, or educational groups. If used by nonprofit educational groups, the property is exempt only if used exclusively for classroom space.

Laws exempting certain property from execution under AS 09 (Code of Civil Procedure) do not exempt the property from taxes levied and collected by municipalities.

The real property owned and occupied as the primary residence and permanent place of abode by a resident who is (1) 65 years of age or older; (2) a disabled veteran; or (3) at least 60 years of age and the widow or widower of a person who qualified for an exemption under (1) or (2) of this subsection is exempt from taxation on the first $150,000 of the assessed value of the real property. A municipality may by ordinance approved by the voters grant the exemption under this subsection to the widow or widower under 60 years of age of a person who qualified for an exemption under (2) of this subsection or to a resident who is the widow or widower of a person who dies from a service-connected cause sustained while serving as a member of the United States armed forces or as a member of the National Guard. A municipality may, in case of hardship, provide for exemption beyond the first $150,000 of assessed value in accordance with regulations of the department. Only one exemption may be granted for the same property, and, if two or more persons are eligible for an exemption for the same property, the parties shall decide between or among themselves who is to receive the benefit of the exemption. Real property may not be exempted under this subsection if the assessor determines, after notice and hearing to the parties, that the property was conveyed to the applicant primarily for the purpose of obtaining the exemption. The determination of the assessor may be appealed under AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

. A municipality shall determine the eligibility requirements and application procedure for an optional exemption provided under this subsection. In this subsection, “widow or widower” means a person whose spouse has died and who has not remarried.

To be eligible for an exemption under (e) of this section for a year, a municipality may by ordinance require that an individual also meet requirements under one of the following paragraphs: (1) the individual shall be eligible for a permanent fund dividend under AS

43.23.005

for that same year or for the immediately preceding year; or (2) if the individual has not applied or does not apply for one or both of the permanent fund dividends, the individual would have been eligible for one of the permanent fund dividends identified in (1) of this subsection had the individual applied. An exemption may not be granted under (e) of this section except upon written application for the exemption. Each municipality shall, by ordinance, establish procedures and deadlines for filing the application. The governing body of the municipality for good cause shown may waive the claimant’s failure to make timely application for exemption and authorize the assessor to accept the application as if timely filed. If an application is filed within the required time and is approved by the assessor, the assessor shall allow an exemption in accordance with the provisions of (e) of this section. If the application for exemption is approved after taxes have been paid, the amount of tax that the claimant has already paid for the property exempted shall be refunded to the claimant. The assessor shall require proof in the form the assessor considers necessary of the right to and amount of an exemption claimed under (e) of this section, and shall require a disabled veteran claiming an exemption under (e) of this section to provide evidence of the disability rating. The assessor may require proof under this subsection at any time.

The state shall reimburse a borough or city, as appropriate, for the real property tax revenues lost to it by the operation of (e) of this section. However, reimbursement may be made to a municipality for revenue lost to it only to the extent that the loss exceeds an exemption that was granted by the municipality, or that on proper application by an individual would have been granted under AS

29.45.050(a)

. If appropriations are not sufficient to fully fund reimbursements under this subsection, the amount available shall be distributed pro rata among eligible municipalities.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, nothing in (e) — (j) of this section affects similar exemptions from property taxes granted by a municipality on September 10, 1972, or prevents a municipality from granting similar exemptions by ordinance as provided in AS

29.45.050

.

In (e) — (i) of this section,

“disabled veteran” means a disabled person

separated from the military service of the United States under a condition that is not dishonorable who is a resident of the state, whose disability was incurred or aggravated in the line of duty in the military service of the United States, and whose disability has been rated as 50 percent or more by the branch of service in which that person served or by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or

who served in the Alaska Territorial Guard, who is a resident of the state, whose disability was incurred or aggravated in the line of duty while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard, and whose disability has been rated as 50 percent or more;

“real property” includes but is not limited to mobile homes, whether classified as real or personal property for municipal tax purposes.

One motor vehicle per household owned by a resident 65 years of age or older on January 1 of the assessment year is exempt either from taxation on its assessed value or from the registration tax under AS

28.10.431

. An exemption may be granted under this subsection only upon written application on a form prescribed by the Department of Administration.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of (g) and (j) of this section.

[Repealed, § 8, ch. 9, SLA 2017.]

For the purpose of determining property exempt under (a)(7)(A) of this section, the following definitions apply to terms used in 43 U.S.C. 1620(d) unless superseded by applicable federal law, and for the purpose of determining property exempt under (a)(7)(B) of this section, the following definitions apply:

“developed” means a purposeful modification of the property from its original state that effectuates a condition of gainful and productive present use without further substantial modification; surveying, construction of roads, providing utilities or other similar actions normally considered to be component parts of the development process, but that do not create the condition described in this paragraph, do not constitute a developed state within the meaning of this paragraph; developed property, in order to remove the exemption, must be developed for purposes other than exploration, and be limited to the smallest practicable tract of the property actually used in the developed state;

“exploration” means the examination and investigation of undeveloped land to determine the existence of subsurface nonrenewable resources;

“lease” means a grant of primary possession entered into for gainful purposes with a determinable fee remaining in the hands of the grantor; with respect to a lease that conveys rights of exploration and development, this exemption shall continue with respect to that portion of the leased tract that is used solely for the purpose of exploration.

If property or an interest in property that is determined not to be exempt under (a)(7) of this section reverts to an undeveloped state, or if the lease is terminated, the exemption shall be granted, subject to the provisions of (a)(7) and (m) of this section.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 1, 2 ch 91 SLA 1985; am § 44 ch 37 SLA 1986; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 70 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1991; am § 14 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 97 SLA 1992; am E.O. No. 99 § 71 (1997); am § 81 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 2, 3 ch 117 SLA 2000; am § 8 ch 136 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 2008; am §§ 1, 2 ch 101 SLA 2008; am §§ 1, 2, 4, 8 ch 10 SLA 2010; am §§
1, 2, ch 71 SLA 2010; am §§
4, 5 ch 61 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 2013; am § 8 ch 9 SLA 2017; am §§ 1, 2 ch 64 SLA 2018)